Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 192.610 to
192.705.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies  to any meeting of the governing body of the following
public bodies:
(a) A common or union high school district;
(b) An education service district;
(c) A community college district; or
(d) A public university described in ORS 352.002.
(2) A public body subject to this section must:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 192.650, make a video recording of all of its meetings; and
(b) Within seven days following the meeting, post  a video recording of the meeting on the
public body’s website or social media site.
(3) If the  facilities of the public body lack broadband Internet access, the public body
may comply with this section by posting  an audio recording of governing body meetings on
the public body website or social media site.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) Any meeting or portion of a meeting that is conducted in executive session; or
(b) A school district with a resident average daily membership of less than 50 students.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1502 (SB 1502-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1502 (SB 1502-A) Page 2